Utah statutes.
78B-8-304.   Violations of service of process authority.

(1)  It is a class A misdemeanor for a person serving process to falsify a return of service.

(2)  It is a class C misdemeanor for a person to bill falsely for process service.



Renumbered and Amended by Chapter 3, 2008 General Session

